Hawaii statutes.
§182-3 Bond; compensation to occupiers.
(a) Every lessee of a mining lease granted under this chapter and every
assignee thereof shall file with the board a bond, in a form and in an amount
approved by the board, made payable to the State and which shall be conditioned
upon the faithful performance by the lessee of all the requirements of this
chapter and of the mining lease, and also conditioned upon the full payment by
the lessee of all damages suffered by the occupiers hereinunder mentioned. If
the State sells or leases its mineral rights on land which it or its
predecessors in interest have granted or leased, or which it may hereafter sell
or lease, and the land thereof including any crops or improvements is damaged
by any mining or other incidental operations, including exploratory work, or by
the failure of the lessee of the mining lease to properly restore the land
after termination of the operations, the occupier shall be reimbursed the full
extent of the damages caused by the mining operations of the lessee to be
allocated between the lessee and the fee owner in accordance with the lease
terms, if any.

(b) Nothing herein shall be construed to
prevent the occupier from demanding and receiving rentals from the lessee of
the mining lease or to forbid and prevent the occupier and the lessee from
agreeing upon the amount of damages to be paid and the terms and conditions of
payment. The occupier may in writing before or within thirty days after the
public auction notify the board that the occupier elects to have the amount of
damages and the amount of rentals to be paid as a result of the mining lease
determined by arbitration with the successful bidder. In such event, the
occupier shall notify the successful bidder of the occupier's election to arbitrate,
and the arbitration shall proceed in accordance with chapter 658A. The
arbitrators in fixing the amount of damages to be paid to the occupier shall
award the occupier the amount which in their judgment shall fairly compensate
the occupier for the damages the occupier may suffer to the occupier's crops or
improvements or to the surface or condition of the occupier's land caused by
the mining or other incidental operations, including exploratory work, and a
reasonable rental for the use of the surface. [L 1963, c 11, pt of §1; Supp,
§99A-3; HRS §182-3; am L 1978, c 135, §2; gen ch 1985; am L 2001, c 265, §4; am
L 2016, c 220, §10]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next